Hawaii statutes.
§188-70 Penalties. (a) Any person
violating any provision of or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, except
sections 188-23 and 188-39.5, is guilty of a petty misdemeanor and, in addition
to any other penalties, shall be fined not less than:

(1) $100 for a first offense;

(2) $200 for a second offense; and

(3) $500 for a third or subsequent offense.

(b) Any person violating section 188-23, is
guilty of a class C felony and shall be sentenced pursuant to chapter 706;
provided that the environmental court, in addition to any term of imprisonment
or any other terms and conditions of probation, shall order the defendant to
pay a fine of not less than $1,000. Notwithstanding section 706-669 and any
other law to the contrary, any person in violation of subsection (b), as a
first offense, shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum period of imprisonment
without possibility of parole for thirty days. Repeat offenders shall be
sentenced pursuant to chapter 706.

(c) The court may require the defendant to
complete an aquatic resources educational class administered by the department
of land and natural resources in addition to or in lieu of paying all or any
part of any monetary fine authorized by this section.

(d) The court may direct the defendant to
perform community service as administered by the department of land and natural
resources in lieu of paying any monetary fine authorized by this section. [L
1981, c 85, §77; am L 1988, c 374, §2; am L 1993, c 256, §4; am L 1999, c 195,
§6; am L 2009, c 92, §3; am L 2014, c 218, §8; am L 2016, c 67, §2]

Cross References

General
administrative penalties, see §187A-12.5.

Case Notes

As sentencing court
limited to alternatives expressly enumerated in this section and probation not
an enumerated alternative, offense of fishing with gill nets under §188-30.2
nonprobationable; thus, under §853-4(5), deferred acceptance of no contest plea
not allowed for that offense. 87 H. 102, 952 P.2d 390.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next